apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="agree__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    
<pardef n="ar/ise__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ise</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ise</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ises</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>isen</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ising</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ising</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ising</l>
          <r>ise<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="aw/ake__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>akes</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oke</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>aken</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="s/it__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>its</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itting</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itting</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itting</l>
          <r>it<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    
    
<pardef n="b/ear__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ears</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>orne</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="b/eat__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eats</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaten</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="bec/ome__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omes</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>      
    
<pardef n="f/all__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alls</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   

<e lm="become"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="come"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fall"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rise"><i>r</i><par n="ar/ise__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sit"><i>s</i><par n="s/it__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="come across"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="come back"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="come in"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="come out"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fall down"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
   <e lm="fall in love"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>love</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>love</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sit down"><i>s</i><par n="s/it__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="free"><i>free</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beat"><i>b</i> <par n="b/eat__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decree"><i>decree</i> <par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arise"><i>ar</i> <par n="ar/ise__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dye"><i>dye</i> <par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
